Utah statutes.
31A-3-105.   Criminal Background Check Restricted Account.

(1)  There is created in the General Fund a restricted account known as the "Criminal Background Check Restricted Account."

(2)  The Criminal Background Check Restricted Account shall consist of the fees imposed by the commissioner in accordance with:

(a)  Subsection 31A-16-103(3);

(b)  Subsection 31A-23a-105(3);

(c)  Subsection 31A-25-203(3); and

(d)  Subsection 31A-26-203(3).

(3)  The commissioner shall administer the Criminal Background Check Restricted Account.  Subject to appropriations by the Legislature, the commissioner shall use the money deposited into the Criminal Background Check Restricted Account to pay the costs the department is required to pay related to obtaining criminal background information in accordance with the provisions listed in Subsection (2)(a).

(4)  An appropriation from the Criminal Background Check Restricted Account is nonlapsing.

